North Carolina, session 2025, HB690.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
SECTION 1. To the extent permitted by federal law, the Department of Health and
Human Services (DHHS) shall take all steps necessary to cease providing State-funded benefits
to noncitizens residing in the United States without legal permission.
SECTION 2. To the extent permitted by federal law, the DHHS shall develop and
implement a plan to review and update the eligibility criteria for all State-funded benefits to
ensure that noncitizens determined to be residing in the United States without legal permission
are ineligible to receive State-funded benefits. As a part of this plan, the DHHS shall develop a
method for verifying the immigration status of applicants for State-funded benefits who are
noncitizens prior to the initiation of benefits.
SECTION 3. By January 15, 2026, the DHHS shall report to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division all of the
following:
(1) The steps taken to implement Section 1 of this act and the resulting success of
those steps.
*H690-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) A list of State-funded benefits for which the DHHS is prohibited from
changing.
(3) The plan developed and implemented pursuant to Section 2 of this act, which
shall include a citation to each federal law or regulation that prohibits the
DHHS from denying eligibility for State-funded benefits to noncitizens
determined to be residing in the United States without legal permission.
SECTION 4. As used in this Part, "State-funded benefits" includes any of the
following programs administered by or through a contract with the DHHS but excludes any
benefits or services available under these programs to help eligible beneficiaries access food or
meals:
(1) Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (Work First).
(2) Early Intervention Services.
(3) Rental or housing assistance programs.
(4) Medication assistance programs.
(5) Child care subsidy programs.
(6) Foster care and adoption assistance payments.
(7) Refugee assistance programs.
(8) Low Income Energy Assistance.
(9) Work First Cash Assistance and other employment and self-sufficiency
training and services.
(10) Medicaid.
(11) Single-stream funding.
(12) Inpatient psychiatric hospital services (3-Way Bed Contracts).
(13) The State-County Special Assistance program.
(14) Programs funded by the Home and Community Care Block Grant.
(15) Caregiver Support programs.

PART II. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, HOUSING FINANCE AGENCY, AND
LOCAL HOUSING AUTHORITIES
SECTION 5. To the extent permitted by federal law, the Department of Commerce,
the Housing Finance Agency, and all local housing authorities established under Chapter 157 of
the General Statutes shall take all steps necessary to cease providing publicly funded housing
benefits to noncitizens residing in the United States without legal permission.
SECTION 6. To the extent permitted by federal law, the Department of Commerce,
the Housing Finance Agency, and all local housing authorities established under Chapter 157 of
the General Statutes shall each develop and implement a plan to review and update the eligibility
criteria for all publicly funded housing benefits to ensure that noncitizens determined to be
residing in the United States without legal permission are ineligible to receive publicly funded
housing benefits. As a part of this plan, the Department of Commerce, the Housing Finance
Agency, and all local housing authorities established under Chapter 157 of the General Statutes
shall develop a method for verifying the immigration status of applicants for publicly funded
housing benefits who are noncitizens prior to the initiation of benefits.
SECTION 7. By January 15, 2026, the Department of Commerce, the Housing
Finance Agency, and all local housing authorities established under Chapter 157 of the General
Statutes shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations and the
Fiscal Research Division on both of the following:
(1) The steps taken to implement Section 5 of this act and the resulting success of
those steps.
(2) The plan developed and implemented pursuant to Section 6 of this act, which
shall include a citation to each federal law or regulation that prohibits the
Department, Office, Agency, or local government unit from denying
Page 2 House Bill 690-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
eligibility for publicly funded benefits to noncitizens determined to be
residing in the United States without legal permission.
SECTION 8. As used in this Part, "publicly funded housing benefits" means any of
the following programs or assistance administered by or through a contract with the Department
of Commerce, the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency, and any local housing authority
established under Chapter 157 of the General Statutes:
(1) Community Development Block Grants (CDBG).
(2) Rental assistance programs.
(3) Transitional housing programs.
(4) Key Rental Assistance programs (KEY).
(5) Subsidized housing assistance programs.
(6) Housing Choice Voucher program (HCV).
(7) NC Home Advantage Mortgage program.
(8) NC 1st Home Advantage Down Payment program.
(9) HOME Investment Partnerships program (HOME).
(10) Community Living programs.
(11) Essential Single-Family Rehabilitation program (ESFR).
(12) Affordable Housing Development Fund program (AHDF).
(13) Emergency Solutions Grants program (ESG), including the Rapid
Unsheltered Survivor Housing program (RUSH).

PART III. THE UNIVERSITY OF NORTH CAROLINA SYSTEM AND THE NORTH
CAROLINA COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM
SECTION 9. By January 15, 2026, the governing bodies of The University of North
Carolina System and the North Carolina Community College System shall adopt and implement
a policy, to the extent allowed by federal law, to verify that all applicants for enrollment are
legally authorized to reside in the United States for determining eligibility for in-State tuition and
financial aid.

PART IV. UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any provision of State law and to the extent
permitted by federal law, by January 15, 2026, the Department of Commerce, Division of
Employment Security, shall adopt and implement a policy to verify, for unemployment benefits
purposes, that all applicants are legally authorized to reside in the United States prior to the first
payment of benefits.

PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 11. This act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 690-Third Edition Page 3